Tennessee, session 114, SB0680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) On and after August 1, 2025, if an LEA or public charter school provides
information on immunizations, infectious diseases, medications, or other school health
issues to parents and guardians of students in grades kindergarten through twelve (K-
12), then the LEA or public charter school shall also include the information about Type
1 and Type 2 diabetes published by the department of education pursuant to subsection
(b).
(b) No later than July 31, 2025, the department of education, in cooperation with
the department of health, shall develop and publish on its website, in a manner that
permits an LEA or public charter school to download the publication for free, a
publication containing the following minimum information on Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes
for distribution to parents and guardians of students in accordance with subsection (a):
(1) A description of Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes;
(2) A description of the risk factors and warning signs associated with
Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes;
(3) A recommendation to a parent or guardian of a student displaying
warning signs associated with Type 1 or Type 2 diabetes that such parent or
SB0680
001469
- 1 -

guardian consult with the student's primary care provider to determine if
immediate screening for Type 1 or Type 2 diabetes is appropriate;
(4) A description of the screening processes for both Type 1 and Type 2
diabetes and of the significance of the stages of Type 1 diabetes; and
(5) A recommendation that, following a Type 1 or Type 2 diabetes
diagnosis, the parent or guardian consult with the student's primary care provider
to develop an appropriate treatment plan.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001469